North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108A. Social Services.
Part 4. Foster Care and Adoption Assistance Payments.

§ 108A-48.
State Foster Care Benefits Program.

The Department is authorized to establish a State Foster Care Benefits Program with appropriations by the General Assembly for the purpose of providing assistance to children who are placed in foster care facilities by county departments of social services in accordance with the rules and regulations of the Social Services Commission. Such appropriations, together with county contributions for this purpose, shall be expended to provide for the costs of keeping children in foster care facilities.

Repealed by Session Laws 2015, c. 241, s. 12C.9(a).

The Department may continue to provide benefits pursuant to this section to an individual who has attained the age of 18 years and chosen to continue receiving foster care services until reaching 21 years of age if the individual is (i) completing secondary education or a program leading to an equivalent credential, (ii) enrolled in an institution that provides postsecondary or vocational education, (iii) participating in a program or activity designed to promote, or remove barriers to, employment, (iv) employed for at least 80 hours per month, or (v) incapable of completing the educational or employment requirements of this subsection due to a medical condition or disability.

With monthly supervision and oversight by the director of the county department of social services or a supervising agency, an individual receiving benefits pursuant to subsection (c) of this section may reside outside a foster care facility in a college or university dormitory or other semi-supervised housing arrangement approved by the director of the county department of social services and continue to receive benefits pursuant to this section.

History.

1981, c. 275, s. 1; 2015-241, s. 12C.9(a).

§ 108A-49.
Foster care and adoption assistance payments.

Benefits in the form of foster care assistance shall be granted in accordance with the rules of the Social Services Commission to any dependent child who would have been eligible to receive Aid to Families with Dependent Children (as that program was in effect on June 1, 1995), but for his or her removal from the home of a specified relative for placement in a foster care facility; provided, that the child’s placement and care is the responsibility of a county department of social services. A county department of social services shall pay, at a minimum, the monthly graduated foster care assistance payments for eligible children as set by the General Assembly. A county department of social services may make foster care assistance payments in excess of the monthly graduated rates set by the General Assembly.

Adoption assistance payments for certain adoptive children shall be granted in accordance with the rules of the Social Services Commission to adoptive parents who adopt a child eligible to receive foster care maintenance payments or supplemental security income benefits; provided, that the child cannot be returned to his or her parents; and provided, that the child has special needs which create a financial barrier to adoption. A county department of social services shall pay, at a minimum, the monthly graduated adoption assistance payments for eligible children as set by the General Assembly. A county department of social services may make adoption assistance payments in excess of the monthly graduated rates set by the General Assembly.

The Department is authorized to use available federal payments to states under Title IV-E of the Social Security Act for foster care and adoption assistance payments.

Except as otherwise prohibited by federal law, the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services, shall not require a redetermination of a child’s eligibility for vendor payments under any adoption assistance agreement established prior to July 1, 2011. Nothing in this subsection shall make vendor assistance an entitlement.

If all other eligibility criteria are met, adoption assistance payments may continue until the beneficiary reaches the age of 21 if the beneficiary was adopted after reaching the age of 16 but prior to reaching the age of 18.

History.

1981, c. 275, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 12.10; 1999-190, s. 3; 2011-383, s. 1; 2015-241, s. 12C.9(b).

Cross References.

As to rules on vendor payments, see 10 N.C.A.C. 70M.0401 et seq.

Foster Care and Adoption Assistance Payments.

Session Laws 2009-451, s. 10.45(a)-(f), provides: “The maximum rates for State participation in the foster care assistance program are established on a graduated scale as follows:

“(1) $475.00 per child per month for children aged birth through 5;

“(2) $581.00 per child per month for children aged 6 through 12; and

“(3) $634.00 per child per month for children aged 13 through 18.

“The maximum rates for the State adoption assistance program are established consistent with the foster care rates as follows:

“(1) $475.00 per child per month for children aged birth through 5;

“(2) $581.00 per child per month for children aged 6 through 12; and

“(3) $634.00 per child per month for children aged 13 through 18.

“In addition to providing board payments to foster and adoptive families of HIV-infected children, as prescribed in Section 23.28 of Chapter 324 of the 1995 Session Laws, any additional funds remaining that were appropriated for this purpose shall be used to provide medical training in avoiding HIV transmission in the home.

“The maximum rates for the State participation in HIV foster care and adoption assistance are established on a graduated scale as follows:

“(1) $800.00 per child per month with indeterminate HIV status;

“(2) $1,000 per child per month confirmed HIV-infected, asymptomatic;

“(3) $1,200 per child per month confirmed HIV-infected, symptomatic; and

“(4) $1,600 per child per month terminally ill with complex care needs.

“The State and a county participating in foster care and adoption assistance shall each contribute fifty percent (50%) of the nonfederal share of the cost of care for a child placed by a county department of social services or child placing agency in a family foster home or residential child care facility. A county shall be held harmless from contributing fifty percent (50%) of the nonfederal share of the cost for a child placed in a family foster home or residential child care facility under an agreement with that provider as of October 31, 2008, until the child leaves foster care or experiences a placement change.

“The Department of Health and Human Services may establish foster care and adoption assistance rates based on the United States Department of Agriculture (USDA) ‘Expenditures on Children by Families’ index subject to State appropriations for each fiscal year.”

For prior similar provisions, see Session Laws 2007-3123, s. 10.29(a)-(g), as amended by Session Laws 2008-107, s. 10.

§ 108A-49.1.
Foster care and adoption assistance payment rates.

The maximum rates for State participation in the foster care assistance program are established on a graduated scale as follows:

$514.00 per child per month for children from birth through five years of age.

$654.00 per child per month for children six through 12 years of age.

$698.00 per child per month for children at least 13 but less than 21 years of age.

The maximum rates for the State adoption assistance program are established consistent with the foster care rates as follows:

$514.00 per child per month for children from birth through five years of age.

$654.00 per child per month for children six through 12 years of age.

$698.00 per child per month for children at least 13 but less than 21 years of age.

The maximum rates for the State participation in human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) foster care and adoption assistance are established on a graduated scale as follows:

$800.00 per child per month with indeterminate HIV status.

$1,000 per child per month with confirmed HIV infection, asymptomatic.

$1,200 per child per month with confirmed HIV infection, symptomatic.

$1,600 per child per month when the child is terminally ill with complex care needs.

In addition to providing board payments to foster and adoptive families of HIV-infected children, any additional funds remaining that are appropriated for purposes described in this subsection shall be used to provide medical training in avoiding HIV transmission in the home.

The State and a county participating in foster care and adoption assistance shall each contribute fifty percent (50%) of the nonfederal share of the cost of care for a child placed by a county department of social services or child-placing agency in a family foster home or residential child care facility. A county shall be held harmless from contributing fifty percent (50%) of the nonfederal share of the cost for a child placed in a family foster home or residential child care facility under an agreement with that provider as of October 31, 2008, until the child leaves foster care or experiences a placement change.

A county shall be held harmless from contributing fifty percent (50%) of the nonfederal share of the cost for an individual receiving benefits pursuant to

G.S. 108A-48(c)

.

History.

2011-145, s. 10.51; 2015-241, s. 12C.9(c); 2021-180, s. 9I.11(a).

§ 108A-50.
State benefits for certain adoptive children.

The Department is authorized to establish a program of State benefits for certain adoptive children from appropriations made by the General Assembly and from grants available from the federal government to the State. This program shall be used exclusively for the purpose of meeting the needs of adoptive children who are physically or mentally handicapped, older, or otherwise hard to place for adoption.

The purpose of this program is to encourage, within the limits of available funds, the adoption of certain hard-to-place children in order to make it possible for children living in, or likely to be placed in foster homes or institutions, to benefit from the stability and security of permanent homes where such children can receive continuous care, guidance, protection and love to reduce the number of such children who might be placed or remain in foster homes or institutions until they become adults.

Eligibility for an adoptive child to receive assistance shall be determined by the Department under the rules and regulations of the Social Services Commission.

Financial assistance under this program shall not be provided when the needed services are available free of cost to the adoptive child; or are covered by an insurance policy of the adoptive parents; or are available to the child under the Adoption Assistance Program specified in

G.S. 108A-49

.

History.

1975, c. 953, s. 3; 1981, c. 275, s. 1.

§ 108A-50.1.
Special Needs Adoptions Incentive Fund.

There is created a Special Needs Adoptions Incentive Fund to provide financial assistance to facilitate the adoption of certain children residing in licensed foster care homes. These funds shall be used to remove financial barriers to the adoption of these children and shall be available to foster care families who adopt children with special needs, as defined by the Social Services Commission. These funds shall be matched by county funds.

This program shall not constitute an entitlement and is subject to the availability of funds.

The Social Services Commission shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.

History.

2003-284, s. 10.45.

§ 108A-50.2.
Adoption Promotion Fund.

Funds appropriated by the General Assembly to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services, for the Adoption Promotion Fund shall be used as provided in this section. The Division of Social Services of the Department of Health and Human Services, in consultation with the North Carolina Association of County Directors of Social Services and representatives of licensed private adoption agencies, shall develop guidelines for the awarding of funds to licensed public and private adoption agencies upon the adoption of children described in

G.S. 108A-50

and in foster care. Payments received from the Adoption Promotion Fund by participating agencies shall be used exclusively to enhance the adoption services. No local match shall be required as a condition for receipt of these funds. In accordance with State rules for allowable costs, the Adoption Promotion Fund may be used for post-adoption services for families whose income exceeds two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty level.

Of the total funds appropriated for the Adoption Promotion Fund each year, twenty percent (20%) of the total funds available shall be reserved for payment to participating private adoption agencies. If the funds reserved in this subsection for payments to private agencies have not been spent on or before March 31 of each State fiscal year, the Division of Social Services may reallocate those funds, in accordance with this section, to other participating adoption agencies.

The Division of Social Services shall monitor the total expenditures in the Adoption Promotion Fund and redistribute unspent funds to ensure that the funds are used in accordance with the guidelines established in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

2009-451, s. 10.48; 2013-360, s. 12C.10(c).

Cross References.

As to A Family for Every Child Initiative, see Part 2 of Article 1A of Chapter 131D,

G.S. 131D-10.9

B, et seq.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 12C.10(c), effective July 1, 2013, substituted “Adoption Promotion” for “Special Children Adoption” throughout the section.